District of Columbia statutes.
47-1509

Repealed

Penalties.

Repealed.

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 833, ch. 759, § 5
Feb. 18, 1929, 45 Stat. 1227, ch. 259, § 5
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 112, ch. 218, § 606
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 573, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(48)
June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-70, title III, § 301, 23 DCR 537
Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-124, title III, § 301(a), 23 DCR 8749
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 2, 24 DCR 7066
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 25(c), 34 DCR 850
June 24, 1988, D.C. Law 7-129, § 2, 35 DCR 4102
Sept. 21, 1988, D.C. Law 7-143, § 2, 35 DCR 5403
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 43(b), 40 DCR 6311
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(p)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-1509.
1973 Ed., § 47-1209.

Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”

1981 Ed., §§ 47-1510, 47-1511.